src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_ZEEQTT
! gradation: no
!! 
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-zeett**

:%^PAL SG-NOM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: zeeʹtt
:%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: zeeʹtt
: A_DER/LAZH ;
:%>a SG-ILL ; !!(3) Sg.Ill: zẹẹtta
: A_DER/SAZH ;
:%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ; !!(4) Sg.Loc: zeeʹttest
:%^PAL SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: zeeʹttin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: zeeʹtten
:%^PAL PL-OBL ; !!(8) Pl.Gen: zeeʹtti
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%> N_KUUQMPEZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: zeeʹttež

LEXICON N_POAOAQMH !!= * @CODE@ pååʹmh:påå{ʹØ}mh
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_POAOAQMH ;
LEXICON NMN_POAOAQMH
! gradation: no
!! 
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-zeett**

:%^PAL SG-NOM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: pååʹmh
:%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: pååʹmh
: A_DER/LAZH ;
:%>a SG-ILL ; !!(3) Sg.Ill: pååmha
: A_DER/SAZH ;
:%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ; !!(4) Sg.Loc: pååʹmhest
:%^PAL SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: pooʹmhin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: pååʹmhen
:%^PAL PL-OBL ; !!(8) Pl.Gen: pooʹmhi
+Der+Der/Dimin+N: E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: pååmhaž



LEXICON N_LUUKK !!= * @CODE@ 
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_LUUKK ;
LEXICON NMN_LUUKK
! gradation: yes
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! ## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.1.3 Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 1.1.3.2 LACKS Gradation
!! ## 1.1.3.2.1 Monophthong
!! ## 1.1.3.2.1.1 Consonant Geminate
!! ## 1.1.3.2.1.1.2 Sg.Nom Strong Grade
!! ## 1.1.3.2.1.1.2.2.Sg.Gen Strong Grade
!! ## 1.1.3.2.1.1.2.2.2 Sg.Ill Strong Grade
!! luukk:luukk is for nouns with -âst Loc and no gradation. N_Y-EPal1-11, N_Y-EPal2-22
!! * Yaml: **saarf, luukk**
 SG-NOM ;
: A_DER/SAZH ;
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
: A_DER/LAZH ;
 NMN_SG-ILL_PAL_E ;
 NMN_SG-LOC_Y ;
 SG-COM_IN ;
 NMN_ESS_Y ; ! ess and prt without
 NMN_PAR_Y ;
 PL-OBL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N: N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paar-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹr-


LEXICON N_BIOLOOG !!= * @CODE@ bioloog:bioloog
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_BIOLOOG ;
LEXICON NMN_BIOLOOG
! gradation: no
!! ## 2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 288)
!! ## 2.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 2.1.3 Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 2.1.3.3 Lacks Gradation (in last syllable)
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1 Monophthong
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3 Consonant always short
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4 Sg.Nom long vowel AND Short consonant
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.3 Sg.Ill Weak Grade
!! bioloog:bioloog
!! * Yaml: **N-bioloog**
: SG-NOM ;		! bioloog
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;		! bioloog
:%^VV2V%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;	! bioloʹǧe
:%>â SG-LOC ;	 	! bioloogâst
: SG-COM_IN ;		! bioloogin
:%>â ESS/PAR ;  		! bioloogân
: PL-OBL ;		! bioloogi
+Der+Der/Dimin+N: N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ bioloog-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ biolooʹǧ-

LEXICON N_JARPLAAN !!= * @CODE@ 
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_JARPLAAN ;
LEXICON NMN_JARPLAAN
! gradation: allegro
!! ## 2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 288)
!! ## 2.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 2.1.3 Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 2.1.3.3 Has Gradation in last syllable
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1 Monophthong
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3 Consonant always short
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4 Sg.Nom Short vowel AND Short consonant
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.3 Sg.Ill Weak Grade
!! jarplan:jarplan
!! * Yaml: **N-jarplaan**
:%^VV2V SG-NOM ;
: SG-NOM ;
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;
:%>â SG-LOC ;
: SG-COM_IN ;
:%>e ESS/PAR ;
: PL-OBL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N: N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paar-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹr-

LEXICON N_1Â_ATOM !!= * @CODE@ atom:ato%^1VOW{ʹØ}m
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! like VIRVEL, KANEL
: NMN_1Â_ATOM ;
LEXICON NMN_1Â_ATOM
! gradation: yes
!! ## 2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 288)
!! ## 2.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 2.1.3 Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 2.1.3.3 Has Gradation in last syllable
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1 Monophthong
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3 Consonant always short
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4 Sg.Nom Short vowel AND Short consonant
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.3 Sg.Ill Weak Grade
!! atom:atom
!! * Yaml: **N-atom**
: SG-NOM ;	    			! atom
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		! atoom
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;      		! atooʹme
:%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;    			! atoomâst
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ;			! atoomin
:%^V2VV%>â ESS/PAR ;  			! atoomân
:%^V2VV PL-NOM ;		! atoom
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paar-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹr-

:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g.
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
:%^V2VV SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg1
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_ESAI !!= * @CODE@ Esai:Esa%^1VOW{ʹØ}i
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_ESAI ;
LEXICON NMN_ESAI !!= * @CODE@ Esai:Esa%^1VOW{ʹØ}i

! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc like ATOM
! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **esai**

: SG-NOM ;	       			! Esai
:%^V2VV%^I2J SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	! Esaaj
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^I2J%>e SG-ILL ;    		! Esaaʹje
:%^V2VV%^I2J%>â SG-LOC ; ! Esaajâst ?
:%^V2VV%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;
:%^V2VV%^I2J%>â ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^V2VV%^I2J PL-NOM ;				! suõskki
:%^V2VV%^I2J PL-OBL ;			! suõskkji
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^I2J  N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^I2J  N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;

:%^V2VV%^I2J HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV%^I2J HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g.
:%^V2VV%^I2J HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
:%^V2VV%^I2J SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg1
:%^V2VV%^I2J HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;


LEXICON N_1Â_VK_VVKK_errorth !!= * @CODE@ äʹmmrik:äʹmmri%^1VOW{ʹØ}k
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! like KAADHNEKH
+Err/Orth: N_1Â_VK_VVKK ;
LEXICON N_1Â_VK_VVKK !!= * @CODE@ äʹmmrik:äʹmmri%^1VOW{ʹØ}k
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! like KAADHNEKH
: NMN_1Â_VK_VVKK ;
LEXICON NMN_1Â_VK_VVKK
!! ä'mmrik:äʹmmri%^1VOW{ʹØ}k
!! * Yaml: **N-**
: SG-NOM ;	    			! äʹmmrik
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		! äʹmmriikk
:{XC}%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK%>e SG-ILL ;      		! äʹmmriʹǩǩe
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC%>â SG-LOC ;    			! äʹmmriikkâst
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC SG-COM_IN ;			! äʹmmriikkin
:{XC}%^C2CC%>â ESS/PAR ;  			! äʹmmrikkân
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC PL-NOM ;		! äʹmmriikk
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC PL-OBL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paar-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:{XC}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹr-

:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g.
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
: SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg1
:{XC}%^V2VV%^C2CC HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_BLOUSLOV !!= * @CODE@ blouslõv:blouslõ%^1VOWv CHECKME
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_BLOUSLOV ;
LEXICON NMN_BLOUSLOV
! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **N-blouslov**
: SG-NOM ;	    			! blouslõm
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		! blouslõõm
:%^PAL%^C2CC%>e SG-ILL ;      		! blouslõʹvve
:%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;    			! blouslõõvâst
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ;			! atoomin
:%^V2VV%>â ESS/PAR ;  			! atoomân
:%^V2VV PL-NOM ;		! atoom
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paar-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹr-

:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g.
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
: SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg1
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_EVANHGHEQLIUM !!= * @CODE@ evaŋǧeʹlium:evaŋǧeʹlium
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_EVANHGHEQLIUM ;
LEXICON NMN_EVANHGHEQLIUM
! gradation: yes
!! evaŋǧeʹlium:evaŋǧeʹlium
!! * Yaml: **N-evaŋǧeʹlium**
: SG-NOM ;	    			! evaŋǧeʹlium
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		! evaŋǧeʹliuum
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;      		! evaŋǧeʹliuʹmme
:%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;    			! evaŋǧeʹliuumâst
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ;			! evaŋǧeʹliuumin
:%^V2VV%>â ESS/PAR ;  			! evaŋǧeʹliumân
:%^V2VV PL-NOM ;		! evaŋǧeʹliuum
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;		! evaŋǧeʹliuumi
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paar-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹr-


LEXICON N_AIHAM !!= * @CODE@ aiham:aiham
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_AIHAM ;
LEXICON NMN_AIHAM
! gradation: yes
!! ## 2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 288)
!! ## 2.1 Sg.Loc in -ast. a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 2.1.3 Sg.Ill in palatalization and -a
!! ## 2.1.3.3 Has Gradation in last syllable
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1 Monophthong
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3 Consonant always short
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4 Sg.Nom Short vowel AND Short consonant
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
!! ## 2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.3 Sg.Ill extra Strong Grade
!! * Yaml: **N-aiham**
: SG-NOM ;	    			! aiham
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;		! aihaam
:{XC}%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ;      		! aihamma
:%^V2VV%>a SG-LOC ;    			! aihaamast
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ;			! aihaamin
:%^V2VV%>a ESS/PAR ;  			! aihaaman
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;





!! ## CLASS 2 NOMINALS with high stem vowel and i-stems
LEXICON N_JUURD !!= * @CODE@ juurd:ju%^1VOWrdd
!!! inflection_type="3"
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_JUURD ;
LEXICON NMN_JUURD !!= * @CODE@ juurd:ju%^1VOWrdd
! gradation: yes
! vowel_center: monophthong
! consonant_center: cluster
! sg_nom_grade: weak
!! is for nouns with stem *i* + *-est* +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the *i* does not occur in +Par 
!! N_GEN2I-ILLAX3-LOCEX3-NOM1X1
!! * Yaml: **N-juurd**
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * juurd:juurd
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>{ʼØ}j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>{ʼØ}j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%>{ʼØ}j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}j%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>{ʼØ}j N_KUYLAZH ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>ǥ N_KUYLAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A_DER/SAZH ;
:%>ǥ VOONYS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-
+Err/Orth:%>{ʼØ}j VOONYS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_AAZZ !!= * @CODE@ aazz:a%^1VOWss
!!! inflection_type="3"
: NMN_AAZZ ;
LEXICON NMN_AAZZ !!= * @CODE@ aazz:a%^1VOWss
!! * Yaml: **N-aazz**
!! * There are several stem types 
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>{ʼØ}j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>{ʼØ}j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%>{ʼØ}j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}j%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^KK2GG%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>{ʼØ}j N_KUYLAZH ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>ǥ N_KUYLAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG A_DER/SAZH ;
:%>ǥ VOONYS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-
+Err/Orth:%>{ʼØ}j VOONYS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_KOODH !!= * @CODE@ koođ:ko%^1VOWđđ
!!! inflection_type="3"
: NMN_KOODH ;
LEXICON NMN_KOODH !!= * @CODE@ koođ:ko%^1VOWđđ
! gradation: yes
! vowel_center: monophthong
! consonant_center: single_consonant
! sg_nom_grade: weak
!! is for nouns with stem *i* + *-est* +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the *i* does not occur in +Par 
!!
!! * Yaml: **N-koodh**
!! * There are several stem types 
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>{ʼØ}j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>{ʼØ}j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%>{ʼØ}j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>{ʼØ}j%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^CC2C%>â ESS/PAR ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>ǥ N_KUYLAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^CC2C A_DER/SAZH ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>{ʼØ}j N_KUYLAZH ;
:%>ǥ VOONYS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-
+Err/Orth:%>{ʼØ}j VOONYS-STEM-PX ; !!= * @CODE@ võnns-

LEXICON N_KAAV !!= * @CODE@ kaav:kaapp
!!! inflection_type="3"
: NMN_KAAV ;
